Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-315
Nebraska Arts Council Trust Fund; created; use.

All funds received by the Nebraska Arts Council under sections 82-313 and 82-314 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Arts Council Trust Fund which is hereby created and which, when appropriated by the Legislature, shall be expended strictly in accord with any conditions that may be attached at the time of their receipt. This section does not apply to funds received by the council under sections 82-330 to 82-333.

Laws 1973, LB 121, § 7;

Laws 1998, LB 799, § 6.